North Dakota statutes. TITLE 58 Townships
CHAPTER 58-15 Police in Unincorporated Townsite [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 439, § 104]

58-15-01.
Petition for police officer in townsite — Contents of petition. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 185, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 2901; C.L. 1913, § 3907; R.C. 1943, § 58-1501; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 263; 1985, ch. 235, § 119; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

58-15-02.
Tax levy for police officer — Certification — Extension. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 185, § 2; R.C. 1905, § 2902; C.L. 1913, § 3908; R.C. 1943, § 58-1502; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 264; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

58-15-03.
Bond of police officer — Removal by board. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 185, §§ 4, 7; R.C. 1905, §§ 2904, 2907; C.L. 1913, §§ 3910, 3913; R.C. 1943, § 58-1503; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 265; 1989, ch. 161, § 10; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

58-15-04.
Powers, duties, and authority of police officer. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 185, § 5; R.C. 1905, § 2905; C.L. 1913, § 3911; R.C. 1943, § 58-1504; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 266; 1989, ch. 161, § 11; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

58-15-05.
Police officer paid monthly. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 185, § 6; R.C. 1905, § 2906; C.L. 1913, § 3912; R.C. 1943, § 58-1505; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

58-15-06.
When tax levy and appointment not to be made. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 185, § 7; R.C. 1905, § 2907; C.L. 1913, § 3913; R.C. 1943, § 58-1506; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

58-15-07.
Collection, payment, and account of taxes. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 185, § 3; R.C. 1905, § 2903; C.L. 1913, § 3909; R.C. 1943, § 58-1507; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 267; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.